Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.08.070

Resignation of directors.

(1) A director may resign at any time by delivering a written notice of resignation to the board of directors, its chairperson, the president, or the secretary of the corporation.

(2) A resignation is effective as provided in RCW 23B.01.410(9) unless the notice provides for a delayed effectiveness, including effectiveness determined upon a future event or events. A resignation that is conditioned upon failing to receive a specified vote for election as a director may provide that it is irrevocable.

[ 2020 c 57 s 58; 2007 c 467 s 3; 2002 c 297 s 28; 1989 c 165 s 86.]